Utah statutes.
62A-15-633.   Persons eligible for care or treatment by federal agency --
Continuing jurisdiction of state courts.
(1)  If an individual committed pursuant to Section 62A-15-631 is eligible for
care or treatment by any agency of the United States, the court, upon receipt
of a certificate from a United States agency, showing that facilities are
available and that the individual is eligible for care or treatment therein,
may order the individual to be placed in the custody of that agency for care.
(2)  When admitted to any facility or institution operated by a United States
agency, within or without this state, the individual shall be subject to the
rules and regulations of that agency.
(3)  The chief officer of any facility or institution operated by a United
States agency and in which the individual is hospitalized, shall, with respect
to that individual, be vested with the same powers as the superintendent or
director of a mental health facility, regarding detention, custody, transfer,
conditional release, or discharge of patients.  Jurisdiction is retained in
appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the mental
condition of an individual so hospitalized, and to determine the necessity for
continuance of hospitalization, and every order of hospitalization issued
pursuant to this section is so conditioned.
